Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5257.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings. The General Assembly finds and declares that:
1. The quality of care in nursing homes is integral to the well-being and dignity of residents.
2. A direct correlation exists between the quality of the workforce and the quality of care
provided in nursing homes.
3. Empirical data and concrete evidence are vital for setting equitable and effective
standards within nursing homes.
4. Consistent operational standards are necessary to foster a fair and competitive
environment in the nursing home sector.
5. Addressing wage disparities in the nursing home sector is crucial for attracting and
retaining qualified staff.
6. Promoting cooperative dynamics between nursing home operators and employees is
vital for resolving industry-specific challenges and enhancing care quality.
7. The establishment of an Advisory Nursing Home Workforce Standards Board, overseen
by the department of labor and training, will enhance communication and collaboration across the
sector.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 17.31

NURSING HOME WORKFORCE STANDARDS BOARD ACT
23-17.31-1. Rhode Island nursing home workforce standards advisory board created-
Compensation and oversight.
(a) There is hereby established the Rhode Island nursing home workforce standards
advisory board, hereinafter referred to as the "board", which shall serve in an advisory capacity to
the Rhode Island general assembly and be overseen by the department of labor and training. The
board shall consist of thirteen (13) members:
(1) The director of the department of labor and training or their designee, serving as the
chairperson.
(2) Three (3) members representing nursing home employers: one appointed by the
governor, one by the speaker of the house and one by the president of the senate.
(3) Three (3) members representing nursing home workers: one appointed by the governor,
one by the speaker of the house, and one by the president of the senate.
(4) Two (2) members representing community organizations that work with the Medicaid
population: one appointed by the speaker of the house and one by the president of the senate.
(5) One member representing a joint labor-management multi-employer nonprofit training
fund, appointed by the governor.
(6) The secretary of the Rhode Island executive office of health and human services or their
designee.
(7) The director of the Rhode Island department of health or their designee.
(8) The long-term care state ombudsman or their designee.
(b) All appointed members shall serve for terms of three (3) years and may be reappointed.
Vacancies shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment but only for the unexpired
portion of the term. Members shall not be compensated for their services.
23-17.31-2. Powers and duties of the board.
The board shall have the power and duty to:
(1) Advise the general assembly and the department of labor and training on market
conditions, wages, benefits, and working conditions in the nursing home industry.
(2) Recommend minimum statewide compensation and working standards for nursing
home workers.
(3) Propose minimum standards for nursing home worker training programs.
(4) Assist in ensuring compliance by employers with the recommended standards.
23-17.31-3. Access to information.
To the extent allowable pursuant to state and federal law, the department of health, the
LC000928 - Page 2 of 4

executive office of health and human services, and/or the department of labor and training, shall
facilitate in the sharing of data requested by the board relating to the operation of nursing homes,
in order for the board to perform its duties.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000928
========
LC000928 - Page 3 of 4